Utah statutes.
78B-13-302.   Scope -- Hague Convention Enforcement.

This chapter may be invoked to enforce:

(1)  a child custody determination; and

(2)  an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

